Utah statutes.
4-32-14.   Attempt to bribe state officer or employee -- Acceptance of bribe -- Interference with official duties -- Penalties.

(1) (a)  Any person who gives, pays, or offers, directly or indirectly, any money or other thing of value, to any officer or employee of this state who is authorized to perform any duties under this chapter, with the intent to influence the officer or employee in the discharge of his duty, is guilty of a felony of the third degree, and upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than $5,000 or imprisonment of not more than five years, or both.

(b)  An officer or employee of this state authorized to perform duties under this chapter who accepts money, a gift, or other thing of value from any person given with intent to influence his official action, is guilty of a felony of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be discharged from office, fined in an amount of not more than $5,000, or imprisoned for not more than five years, or both.

(2) (a)  Any person who assaults, obstructs, impedes, intimidates, or interferes with any person engaged in the performance of official duties under this chapter, with or without a dangerous or deadly weapon, is guilty of a felony of the third degree and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by imprisonment of not more than five years, or both.

(b)  Any person who, in the commission of any violation of Subsection (2) of this section, uses a dangerous weapon as defined in Section 76-1-601, is guilty of a felony of the second degree and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by imprisonment for a period of not more than 10 years, or both.

(c)  Any person who kills another person engaged in the performance of official duties under this chapter shall be punished as provided in Section 76-5-202.

